GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/italian.lexc
LEXICON V05A5	0:iate		V00A5;
LEXICON V05A6	0:iano		V00A6;
LEXICON V05A	V05A1; V05A2; V05A3; V05A4; V05A5; V05A6;

LEXICON V05B1	0:iavo		V00B1;
LEXICON V05B2	0:iavi		V00B2;
LEXICON V05B3	0:iava		V00B3;
LEXICON V05B4	0:iavamo		V00B4;
LEXICON V05B5	0:iavate		V00B5;
LEXICON V05B6	0:iavano		V00B6;
LEXICON V05B	V05B1; V05B2; V05B3; V05B4; V05B5; V05B6;

LEXICON V05C1	0:iai		V00C1;
LEXICON V05C2	0:iasti		V00C2;
LEXICON V05C3	0:iò		V00C3;
LEXICON V05C4	0:iammo		V00C4;
LEXICON V05C5	0:iaste		V00C5;
LEXICON V05C6	0:iarono		V00C6;
LEXICON V05C	V05C1; V05C2; V05C3; V05C4; V05C5; V05C6;

LEXICON V05D1	0:erò		V00D1;
LEXICON V05D2	0:erai		V00D2;
LEXICON V05D3	0:erà		V00D3;
LEXICON V05D4	0:eremo		V00D4;
LEXICON V05D5	0:erete		V00D5;
LEXICON V05D6	0:eranno		V00D6;
LEXICON V05D	V05D1; V05D2; V05D3; V05D4; V05D5; V05D6;

LEXICON V05E1	0:i		V00E1;
LEXICON V05E2	0:i		V00E2;
LEXICON V05E3	0:i		V00E3;
LEXICON V05E4	0:iamo		V00E4;
LEXICON V05E5	0:iate		V00E5;
LEXICON V05E6	0:ino		V00E6;
LEXICON V05E	V05E1; V05E2; V05E3; V05E4; V05E5; V05E6;

LEXICON V05F1	0:iassi		V00F1;
LEXICON V05F2	0:iassi		V00F2;
LEXICON V05F3	0:iasse		V00F3;
LEXICON V05F4	0:iassimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V05F5	0:iaste		V00F5;
LEXICON V05F6	0:iassero	V00F6;
LEXICON V05F	V05F1; V05F2; V05F3; V05F4; V05F5; V05F6;

LEXICON V05G1	0:erei		V00G1;
LEXICON V05G2	0:eresti	V00G2;
LEXICON V05G3	0:erebbe	V00G3;
LEXICON V05G4	0:eremmo	V00G4;
LEXICON V05G5	0:ereste	V00G5;
LEXICON V05G6	0:erebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V05G	V05G1; V05G2; V05G3; V05G4; V05G5; V05G6;

LEXICON V05H	0:iant		V00H;
LEXICON V05I	0:iat		V00I;	
LEXICON V05L	0:iando		V00L;	
LEXICON V05M	0:iare		V00M;
	
LEXICON V05N2	0:ia		V00N2;
LEXICON V05N3	0:i		V00N3;
LEXICON V05N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V05N5	0:iate		V00N5;
LEXICON V05N6	0:ino		V00N6;
LEXICON V05N	V05N2; V05N3; V05N4; V05N5; V05N6;

LEXICON V05	V05A; V05B; V05C; V05D; V05E; V05F; V05G; 
		V05H; V05I; V05L; V05M; V05N;

!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 6   (dare)
!radice/i: d/dett/died
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4          5          6
!
!ind_pre   a           o         ai         a`       iamo        ate       anno
!ind_imp   b         avo        avi        ava      avamo      avate      avano
!pas_rem   c           i       esti          e       emmo       este        ero
!futuro    d        aro`       arai       ara`      aremo      arete     aranno
!con_pre   e          ia         ia         ia       iamo       iate       iano
!con_imp   f        essi       essi       esse     essimo       este     essero
!condiz    g        arei     aresti     arebbe     aremmo     areste   arebbero
!part_pre  h        ante       anti
!part_pas  i         ato (ata,ati,ate)
!gerundio  l        ando
!infinito  m         are
!imperat   n                  ai/a'        ia        iamo        ate       iano

LEXICON V06A1	0:o		V00A1;
LEXICON V06A2	0:ai		V00A2;
LEXICON V06A3	0:à		V00A3;
LEXICON V06A4	0:iamo		V00A4;
LEXICON V06A5	0:ate		V00A5;
LEXICON V06A6	0:anno		V00A6;
LEXICON V06A	V06A1; V06A2; V06A3; V06A4; V06A5; V06A6;

LEXICON V06B1	0:avo		V00B1;
LEXICON V06B2	0:avi		V00B2;
LEXICON V06B3	0:ava		V00B3;
LEXICON V06B4	0:avamo		V00B4;
LEXICON V06B5	0:avate		V00B5;
LEXICON V06B6	0:avano		V00B6;
LEXICON V06B	V06B1; V06B2; V06B3; V06B4; V06B5; V06B6;

LEXICON V06C1	0:i		V00C1;
LEXICON V06C2	0:esti		V00C2;
LEXICON V06C3	0:e		V00C3;
LEXICON V06C4	0:emmo		V00C4;
LEXICON V06C5	0:este		V00C5;
LEXICON V06C6	0:ero		V00C6;
LEXICON V06C	V06C1; V06C2; V06C3; V06C4; V06C5; V06C6;

LEXICON V06D1	0:arò		V00D1;
LEXICON V06D2	0:arai		V00D2;
LEXICON V06D3	0:arà		V00D3;
LEXICON V06D4	0:aremo		V00D4;
LEXICON V06D5	0:arete		V00D5;
LEXICON V06D6	0:aranno		V00D6;
LEXICON V06D	V06D1; V06D2; V06D3; V06D4; V06D5; V06D6;

LEXICON V06E1	0:ia		V00E1;
LEXICON V06E2	0:ia		V00E2;
LEXICON V06E3	0:ia		V00E3;
LEXICON V06E4	0:iamo		V00E4;
LEXICON V06E5	0:iate		V00E5;
LEXICON V06E6	0:iano		V00E6;
LEXICON V06E	V06E1; V06E2; V06E3; V06E4; V06E5; V06E6;

LEXICON V06F1	0:essi		V00F1;
LEXICON V06F2	0:essi		V00F2;
LEXICON V06F3	0:esse		V00F3;
LEXICON V06F4	0:essimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V06F5	0:este		V00F5;
LEXICON V06F6	0:essero	V00F6;
LEXICON V06F	V06F1; V06F2; V06F3; V06F4; V06F5; V06F6;

LEXICON V06G1	0:arei		V00G1;
LEXICON V06G2	0:aresti	V00G2;
LEXICON V06G3	0:arebbe	V00G3;
LEXICON V06G4	0:aremmo	V00G4;
LEXICON V06G5	0:areste	V00G5;
LEXICON V06G6	0:arebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V06G	V06G1; V06G2; V06G3; V06G4; V06G5; V06G6;

LEXICON V06H	0:ant		V00H;
LEXICON V06I	0:at		V00I;	
LEXICON V06L	0:ando		V00L;	
LEXICON V06M	0:are		V00M;
	
LEXICON V06N2	0:ai		V00N2;
		0:a'		V00N2;
LEXICON V06N3	0:ia		V00N3;
LEXICON V06N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V06N5	0:ate		V00N5;
LEXICON V06N6	0:iano		V00N6;
LEXICON V06N	V06N2; V06N3; V06N4; V06N5; V06N6;

LEXICON V06	V06A; V06B; V06C; V06D; V06E; V06F; V06G; 
		V06H; V06I; V06L; V06M; V06N;


!===============================================================================
!VERB : CLASSE 7   (cadere)
!radice:cad/cadd
!
!TEMPO     COD         1          2          3          4          5          6
!
!ind_pre   a           o          i          e       iamo       ete        ono 
!ind_imp   b         evo        evi        eva      evamo     evate      evano
!pas_rem   c           i       esti          e       emmo      este        ero
!futuro    d         ro`        rai        ra`       remo      rete      ranno
!con_pre   e           a          a         a        iamo      iate        ano 
!con_imp   f        essi       essi      esse      essimo      este     essero
!condiz    g         rei      resti     rebbe       remmo     reste    rebbero
!part_pre  h        ente       enti
!part_pas  i         uto (uta,uti,ute)
!gerundio  l        endo
!infinito  m         ere
!imperat   n                      i          a       iamo       ete        ano

LEXICON V07A1	0:o		V00A1;
LEXICON V07A2	0:i		V00A2;
LEXICON V07A3	0:e		V00A3;
LEXICON V07A4	0:iamo		V00A4;
LEXICON V07A5	0:ete		V00A5;
LEXICON V07A6	0:ono		V00A6;
LEXICON V07A	V07A1; V07A2; V07A3; V07A4; V07A5; V07A6;

LEXICON V07B1	0:evo		V00B1;
LEXICON V07B2	0:evi		V00B2;
LEXICON V07B3	0:eva		V00B3;
LEXICON V07B4	0:evamo		V00B4;
LEXICON V07B5	0:evate		V00B5;
LEXICON V07B6	0:evano		V00B6;
LEXICON V07B	V07B1; V07B2; V07B3; V07B4; V07B5; V07B6;

LEXICON V07C1	0:i		V00C1;
LEXICON V07C2	0:esti		V00C2;
LEXICON V07C3	0:e		V00C3;
LEXICON V07C4	0:emmo		V00C4;
LEXICON V07C5	0:este		V00C5;
LEXICON V07C6	0:er		V00C6;
LEXICON V07C	V07C1; V07C2; V07C3; V07C4; V07C5; V07C6;

LEXICON V07D1	0:rò		V00D1;
LEXICON V07D2	0:rai		V00D2;
LEXICON V07D3	0:rà		V00D3;
LEXICON V07D4	0:remo		V00D4;
LEXICON V07D5	0:rete		V00D5;
LEXICON V07D6	0:ranno		V00D6;
LEXICON V07D	V07D1; V07D2; V07D3; V07D4; V07D5; V07D6;

LEXICON V07E1	0:a		V00E1;
LEXICON V07E2	0:a		V00E2;
LEXICON V07E3	0:a		V00E3;
LEXICON V07E4	0:iamo		V00E4;
LEXICON V07E5	0:iate		V00E5;
LEXICON V07E6	0:ano		V00E6;
LEXICON V07E	V07E1; V07E2; V07E3; V07E4; V07E5; V07E6;

LEXICON V07F1	0:essi		V00F1;
LEXICON V07F2	0:essi		V00F2;
LEXICON V07F3	0:esse		V00F3;
LEXICON V07F4	0:essimo	V00F4;
LEXICON V07F5	0:este		V00F5;
LEXICON V07F6	0:essero	V00F6;
LEXICON V07F	V07F1; V07F2; V07F3; V07F4; V07F5; V07F6;

LEXICON V07G1	0:rei		V00G1;
LEXICON V07G2	0:resti		V00G2;
LEXICON V07G3	0:rebbe		V00G3;
LEXICON V07G4	0:remmo		V00G4;
LEXICON V07G5	0:reste		V00G5;
LEXICON V07G6	0:rebbero	V00G6;
LEXICON V07G	V07G1; V07G2; V07G3; V07G4; V07G5; V07G6;

LEXICON V07H	0:ent		V00H;
LEXICON V07I	0:ut		V00I;	
LEXICON V07L	0:endo		V00L;	
LEXICON V07M	0:ere		V00M;
	
LEXICON V07N2	0:i		V00N2;
LEXICON V07N3	0:a		V00N3;
LEXICON V07N4	0:iamo		V00N4;
LEXICON V07N5	0:ete		V00N5;
LEXICON V07N6	0:ano		V00N6;
LEXICON V07N	V07N2; V07N3; V07N4; V07N5; V07N6;

LEXICON MAIN
andare+Verb:and	V06A4;
avere+Verb+Aux+Trans:abb	V05N5;
avere+Verb+Trans:abb	V05N5;
avere+Verb+Trans:h	V06A1;
dare+Verb+Trans:d	V06C2;
dare+Verb+Trans:d	V06C4;
dare+Verb+Trans:d	V06C5;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05A;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05B;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05C;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05E;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05F;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05H;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05I;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05L;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05M;
deviare+Verb+Trans:dev	V05N;
disfare+Verb+Trans:disf	V06A2;
disfare+Verb+Trans:disf	V06A6;
divenire+Verb:diven	V07I;
dovere+Verb+Trans:dev	V07A2;
dovere+Verb+Trans:dev	V07A3;
dovere+Verb+Trans:dov	V07D;
dovere+Verb+Trans:dov	V07G;
equivalere+Verb:equivalg	V07A1;
equivalere+Verb:equivalg	V07A6;
equivalere+Verb:equival	V07A4;
equivalere+Verb:equival	V07A5;
equivalere+Verb:equival	V07M;
esporre+Verb+Trans:espong	V07E1;
esporre+Verb+Trans:espong	V07E2;
esporre+Verb+Trans:espong	V07E3;
esporre+Verb+Trans:espong	V07E6;
esporre+Verb+Trans:espon	V07E4;
esporre+Verb+Trans:espon	V07E5;
esporre+Verb+Trans:espon	V07N5;
fare+Verb+Trans:facc	V06N3;
fare+Verb+Trans:facc	V06N4;
fare+Verb+Trans:facc	V06N6;
favoleggiare+Verb:favolegg	V05;
frapporre+Verb+Trans:frappon	V07N4;
giustapporre+Verb+Trans:giustappong	V07N3;
giustapporre+Verb+Trans:giustappon	V07N2;
intrattenere+Verb+Trans:intrattenn	V07C1;
intrattenere+Verb+Trans:intrattenn	V07C3;
intrattenere+Verb+Trans:intrattenn	V07C6;
opporre+Verb+Trans:oppon	V07B;
opporre+Verb+Trans:oppon	V07F;
opporre+Verb+Trans:oppon	V07H;
opporre+Verb+Trans:oppon	V07L;
parcheggiare+Verb+Trans:parchegg	V05;
piovere+Verb:piov	V07C2;
piovere+Verb:piov	V07C4;
piovere+Verb:piov	V07C5;
posporre+Verb+Trans:pospon	V07A2;
posporre+Verb+Trans:pospon	V07A3;
presupporre+Verb+Trans:presuppong	V07A1;
presupporre+Verb+Trans:presuppong	V07A6;
presupporre+Verb+Trans:presuppon	V07A4;
presupporre+Verb+Trans:presuppon	V07A5;
prevalere+Verb:prevalg	V07E1;
prevalere+Verb:prevalg	V07E2;
prevalere+Verb:prevalg	V07E3;
prevalere+Verb:prevalg	V07E6;
prevalere+Verb:preval	V07E4;
prevalere+Verb:preval	V07E5;
prevalere+Verb:preval	V07N5;
prevedere+Verb+Trans:preved	V07A;
prevedere+Verb+Trans:preved	V07E;
produrre+Verb+Trans:produr	V07D;
produrre+Verb+Trans:produr	V07G;
proporre+Verb+Trans:propon	V07N4;
putrefare+Verb+Trans:putref	V06A5;
putrefare+Verb+Trans:putref	V06D;
putrefare+Verb+Trans:putref	V06G;
putrefare+Verb+Trans:putref	V06M;
putrefare+Verb+Trans:putref	V06N2;
rarefare+Verb+Trans:rarefacc	V06E;
rarefare+Verb+Trans:raref	V06N5;
ricomporre+Verb+Trans:ricompong	V07N3;
ricomporre+Verb+Trans:ricompong	V07N6;
ricomporre+Verb+Trans:ricompon	V07N2;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06A;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06B;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06C2;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06C4;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06C5;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06F;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06H;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06I;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06L;
ridare+Verb+Trans:rid	V06N;
rifare+Verb+Trans:rifacc	V06N3;
rifare+Verb+Trans:rifacc	V06N4;
rifare+Verb+Trans:rifacc	V06N6;
rifare+Verb+Trans:rif	V06A2;
rifare+Verb+Trans:rif	V06A3;
rifare+Verb+Trans:rif	V06A6;
rincrescere+Verb:rincresci	V07I;
sapere+Verb+Trans:sepp	V06C1;
sapere+Verb+Trans:sepp	V06C3;
sapere+Verb+Trans:sepp	V06C6;
scadere+Verb:scad	V07M;
soddisfare+Verb+Trans:soddisf	V06D;
soddisfare+Verb+Trans:soddisf	V06G;
soddisfare+Verb+Trans:soddisf	V06M;
soddisfare+Verb+Trans:soddisf	V06N2;
sopraffare+Verb+Trans:sopraff	V06A5;
sottostare+Verb:sottostó	V06A1;
sottostare+Verb:sottost	V06A3;
sottostare+Verb:sottost	V06A4;
sottostare+Verb:sottost	V06B;
sottostare+Verb:sottost	V06C6;
sottostare+Verb:sottost	V06F;
sottostare+Verb:sottost	V06H;
sottostare+Verb:sottost	V06I;
sottostare+Verb:sottost	V06L;
sottostare+Verb:sottost	V06N;
stare+Verb:st	V06A;
stare+Verb:st	V06C1;
stare+Verb:st	V06C3;
strafare+Verb+Trans:strafacc	V06E;
strafare+Verb+Trans:straf	V06N5;
stravedere+Verb:stravid	V07C1;
stravedere+Verb:stravid	V07C3;
stravedere+Verb:stravid	V07C6;
supporre+Verb+Trans:suppon	V07B;
tenere+Verb+Trans:ten	V07F;
tenere+Verb+Trans:ten	V07H;
tenere+Verb+Trans:ten	V07L;
trattenere+Verb+Trans:tratten	V07C2;
trattenere+Verb+Trans:tratten	V07C4;
trattenere+Verb+Trans:tratten	V07C5;
vivere+Verb+Trans:viv	V07A;
vivere+Verb+Trans:viv	V07E;
vivere+Verb+Trans:viv	V07N;
